Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-825
Foreign health and accident associations; deposit in state of domicile.

After August 24, 1941, no foreign assessment association shall be authorized to transact the business of accident or health insurance in this state unless it shall have assets on deposit with the insurance department of the state of its domicile in an amount at least equal to the requirements herein made applicable to like domestic associations.

Laws 1941, c. 89, § 6, p. 343;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 44-812;

R.S.1943, § 44-825.